Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.310

Licensee's failure to pay vendor, consignor—Settlement, compromise—Creditors share—Priority of state's claim.

In any settlement or compromise by the director with a surety company as provided in RCW 16.65.290, where there are two or more consignor and/or vendor creditors that have filed claims, either fixed or contingent, against a licensee's bond, such creditors shall share pro rata in the proceeds of the bond to the extent of their actual damage: PROVIDED, That the claims of the state and the department which may accrue from the conduct of the licensee's public livestock market shall have priority over all other claims.

[ 1959 c 107 s 31.]